California, session 20252026, AB1436.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(1) Extending regulatory requirements to privately operated vehicle fleets through mandates placed on public entities or contracts, whether directly or indirectly, may have unintended impacts on affordability and the continuity of services provided to residents through public and private partnerships.(2) Providing regulatory clarity and predictability for public entities and their private partners is necessary given the potential fiscal and operational constraints that could be imposed and the need to maintain reliable delivery of essential public services.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that regulatory actions described in subdivision (a) do not occur unless the State Air Resources Board obtains authorization to regulate privately operated vehicle fleets under applicable federal law.SEC. 2. Section 43110 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:43110. (a) The state board shall not adopt or enforce any regulation that directly or indirectly compels compliance by private fleets, including, but not limited to, those operated by contractors or subcontractors of the state or a local entity, including, but not limited to, a city, a county, or a city and county. fleets that would be preempted under Section 209(a) of the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7543(a)) until the required waiver or authorization is obtained in accordance with Section 209(b) of the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7543(b)).(b)Subdivision (a) does not apply to a regulation adopted after the state has obtained a required waiver or authorization under Section 209 of the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7543).(b) The use of private fleets in subdivision (a) includes, but is not limited to, those operated by contractors or subcontractors of the state or a local government entity, including, but not limited to, any city, county, public utility, special district, local agency or district, and any department, division, public corporation, or public agency of the State of California.(c) Any provision of a regulation adopted in violation of this section is void and unenforceable.